New.aff
PFX N 0 olumu .
PFX N 0 oluba .
PFX N 0 olugu .
PFX N 0 olugi .
PFX N 0 oluzi .
PFX N 0 oluki .
PFX N 0 olubi .
PFX N 0 oluli .
PFX N 0 oluga .
PFX N 0 oluka .
PFX N 0 olubu .
PFX N 0 olulu .
PFX N 0 oluku .
PFX N 0 olutu .
PFX N 0 kun [^lmn]
PFX N l kund l.[^mn]
PFX N l kunn l.[mn]
PFX N w kump [w]
PFX N 0 kumu .
PFX N 0 kuba .
PFX N 0 kugu .
PFX N 0 kugi .
PFX N 0 kuzi .
PFX N 0 kuki .
PFX N 0 kubi .
PFX N 0 kuli .
PFX N 0 kuga .
PFX N 0 kuka .
PFX N 0 kubu .
PFX N 0 kulu .
PFX N 0 kuku .
PFX N 0 kutu .
PFX N 0 okun [^lmn]
PFX N l okund l.[^mn]
PFX N l okunn l.[mn]
PFX N w okump [w]
PFX N 0 okumu .
PFX N 0 okuba .
PFX N 0 okugu .
PFX N 0 okugi .
PFX N 0 okuzi .
PFX N 0 okuki .
PFX N 0 okubi .
PFX N 0 okuli .
PFX N 0 okuga .
PFX N 0 okuka .
PFX N 0 okubu .
PFX N 0 okulu .
PFX N 0 okuku .
PFX N 0 okutu .
PFX N 0 otun [^lmn]
PFX N l otund l.[^mn]
PFX N l otunn l.[mn]
PFX N w otump [w]
PFX N 0 otumu .
PFX N 0 otuba .
PFX N 0 otugu .
PFX N 0 otugi .
PFX N 0 otuzi .
PFX N 0 otuki .
PFX N 0 otubi .
PFX N 0 otuli .
PFX N 0 otuga .
PFX N 0 otuka .
PFX N 0 otubu .
PFX N 0 otulu .
PFX N 0 otuku .
PFX N 0 otutu .
